Louisiana, session 2026, SB415.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart E of Part II of Chapter 3 of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 46:291, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
SUBPART E. EMPOWER LOUISIANA FOOD PURCHASE PROGRAM
§291. Empower Louisiana Food Purchase Program; Louisiana Department of
Health
A. The Louisiana Department of Health shall establish and administer
the Empower Louisiana Food Purchase Program. The program shall make
restricted-use food purchase cards available for issuance through qualified
nonprofit organizations.
B.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health shall partner with qualified
nonprofit organizations that operate food assistance programs in Louisiana.
(2) To qualify for participation in the program, the organization shall be
recognized under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, execute a
participation agreement, and comply with reporting requirements established
by the Louisiana Department of Health.
(3) The Louisiana Department of Health may implement the program as
a pilot program in one administrative region of the state and may expand the
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 415 ENROLLED
program as determined by the secretary. Upon statewide implementation, the
program shall include at least one participating qualified nonprofit organization
in each administrative region of the Louisiana Department of Health.
C.(1) Each qualified nonprofit organization shall do all of the following:
(a) Be responsible for funding any purchase cards issued by the
organization.
(b) Accept charitable contributions to support the program.
(c) Establish a process to allow individuals to provide funding for cards.
(2) Cards may be issued directly to the individual providing the funds or
to another person identified by the individual providing the funds for the card.
D.(1) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to create a public
entitlement, require participation, authorize federal funding, or merge the
program with Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(2) Benefits provided pursuant to this Section shall be considered
charitable food assistance and shall not be construed as wages, compensation,
or remuneration to the recipient.
E. The Louisiana Department of Health shall establish uniform
guidelines and operating standards for the program.
F. The program shall do all of the following:
(1) Operate under a program identifier separate from Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program.
(2) Align food items that are allowable for purchase with food items that
are eligible for purchase through Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(3) Prohibit cash withdrawals and transfers.
(4) Not access Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program eligibility or
recipient data.
G. Transaction records shall be generated automatically by the payment
processor. The Louisiana Department of Health shall generate aggregate annual
transaction reports, which participating nonprofits shall reconcile to their
internal records. The Louisiana Department of Health may review, monitor,
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 415 ENROLLED
and inspect records as necessary for the provisions of this Section. Any recipient
information collected pursuant to this Section shall be confidential and shall not
be used for solicitation, marketing, or any purpose not related to the program.
H. The Louisiana Department of Health shall promulgate rules in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions
of this Section.
I. The Louisiana Department of Health shall utilize existing resources
and staff to fulfill the requirements provided for in this Section.
Section 2. No later than March 1, 2027, the Louisiana Department of Health shall
submit a report evaluating the program provided for in this Act to the Senate and House
committees on health and welfare.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.